Arkansas, session 2025, HB1051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-106(a), concerning the first day of
the school year for public schools, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Each school year, each public school district board of
directors or governing entity of an open-enrollment public charter school
shall establish by policy the first day of the school year for student
attendance in public elementary and secondary schools shall be:
(i) On or after the Monday of the week in which
August 19 falls;
(ii) Not earlier than August 14; and
(iii) Not later than August 26.
(B) The date for beginning the school year shall be
determined by the board of directors of each school district The first day
of the school year for student attendance established under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section shall comply with the number of student-teacher
interaction days or hours required by the Standards for Accreditation of
Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts established by the State Board
of Education.
(C)(2) Labor Day shall be celebrated as a school holiday in all
*TNL022*
01-15-2025 11:53:37 TNL022

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 HB1051
the school districts of the state, and school shall not be held on that date.
(D)(3) As used in this section, “week” means a seven-day period
that begins on a Sunday and ends on a Saturday.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may grant
a school district a waiver to begin school on an earlier or a later date if
the division determines that there exists a material and substantial reason
for the school district to begin school on an earlier or a later date due to
very exceptional or emergency circumstances such as a contagious disease
outbreak, inclement weather, or other acts of God.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that public schools need ample time
to select and announce the school calendar for the upcoming school year,
which requires meetings and determinations of certain dates; that for
purposes of teacher and administrator contracts, establishing the school
calendar is vital; and that this act is immediately necessary because public
schools need to know as soon as possible what the statutory requirements are
with respect to establishing the school calendars for the upcoming school
year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto."


/s/Andrews






01-15-2025 11:53:37 TNL022